Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2647
Violations; penalties; Attorney General or county attorney; duties.

(1) Any person who commits an unlawful act under the Pesticide Act, any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, or any final order of the department shall (a) be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and, upon a subsequent conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor and (b) be subject to a restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction if such person has violated, is violating, or is threatening to violate the act, the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any final order of the department. The district court of the county where the violation has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which the violation of the act has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur, when notified by the director of such violation or threatened violation, to pursue appropriate proceedings without delay pursuant to this section.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the director to report all acts for prosecution if in the opinion of the director the public interest will best be served through other administrative or civil procedures.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 26.